Utah statutes.
17-25-2.   Fees for constables -- Civil.

(1)  Constables may for their own use collect as compensation in civil matters the same fees as those specified for sheriffs in Section 17-22-2.5.

(2)  Constable fees that exceed the amounts in Section 17-22-2.5 are recoverable:

(a)  by the constable only if he has received prior approval for the increased fee from the party requesting the service; and

(b)  by prevailing party as a cost of the action only if the court finds the service and increased fee are justifiable.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 46, 2001 General Session

